Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 89.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-189
Authority and duty of regulatory body
licensing professionals.

Nothing
in the Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability Company Act is intended to restrict
or limit in any manner the authority and duty of any regulatory body licensing
professionals within the state to license such persons rendering a professional
service or to regulate the practice of any profession that is within the jurisdiction
of the regulatory body licensing such professionals within the state notwithstanding
that the person is a member, manager, professional employee, or agent of a
limited liability company and rendering a professional service or engaging
in the practice of the profession through a limited liability company.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 89.